Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 8. HEALTH INSURANCE AND OTHER HEALTH COVERAGES

SUBTITLE I. SPECIALIZED COVERAGES

CHAPTER 1653. HIGH DEDUCTIBLE HEALTH PLAN

Sec. 1653.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "high deductible health plan" has the meaning assigned by Section 223, Internal Revenue Code of 1986.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 151 (H.B. 1602), Sec. 1, eff. May 24, 2005.

Sec. 1653.002. APPLICABILITY OF OTHER LAW. (a) Subject to Subsection (b), a high deductible health plan is subject to any law mandating a minimum health insurance benefit or reimbursement.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a provision of this code may not be construed to prevent an insurer, health maintenance organization, or other entity issuing a health insurance policy or certificate of coverage from applying deductible or copayment requirements to benefits, including state-mandated health benefits, in order to qualify the health insurance policy or certificate of coverage as a high deductible health plan.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 151 (H.B. 1602), Sec. 1, eff. May 24, 2005.

Sec. 1653.003. RULES. The commissioner shall adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 151 (H.B. 1602), Sec. 1, eff. May 24, 2005.